Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.79.195 and 2025 c 424 s 951 and 2025 c 58 s 3010 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The workforce education investment account is created in the state treasury. All revenues from the workforce investment surcharge created in RCW 82.04.299 and those revenues as specified under RCW 82.04.290(2)(c) must be deposited directly into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for higher education programs, higher education operations, higher education compensation, state-funded student aid programs, and workforce development including career connected learning as defined by RCW 28C.30.020.(2) ((Except in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, expenditures))Expenditures from the workforce education investment account must be used to supplement, not supplant, any other federal, state, and local ((funding))funds appropriated or allocated for higher education. ((It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.))The legislature affirms that appropriations from this account are intended to provide additional, enhanced, and expanded support for higher-education programs and services, and may not be used as a replacement, offset, or reduction of existing or projected funding obligations from other sources.--- END ---